Utah statutes.
58-9-702.   Payments to be held in trust -- Trustee qualifications.
(1)  All money representing payments for the purchase of a preneed funeral
arrangement shall be deposited by the provider or sales agent receiving the
payment:
(a)  within ten business days after the day on which the provider or sales
agent receives the payment in the form of cash or cash equivalent; or
(b)  within 35 calendar days after the day on which the provider or sales
agent receives the payment in the form of a negotiable instrument.
(2)  All money received under Subsection (1) shall be placed in a trust
account naming as trustee a Utah financial institution authorized to engage in
the trust business under Title 7, Chapter 5, Trust Business.
